Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4693.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 Sec. 9. The department may charge a fee for the publication and distribution of the public act from which that provides a board's authority is derived and the rules promulgated under that act. The fee shall be $2.00 or is the cost of the publication. , 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 whichever is greater. Sec. 25. (1) Fees Subject to subsection (2), fees for a person an individual licensed or seeking licensure as a cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair culturist, esthetician, electrologist, or instructor or a person licensed or seeking licensure to operate a cosmetology establishment, or school of cosmetology, or secondary school facility, seeking a student registration or transfer, or seeking a permit to conduct an apprenticeship program under article 12 of the occupational code, MCL 339.1201 to 339.1218, are as follows: (a) Application processing fees: (i) Apprenticeship program $ 25.00 (ii) Cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair culturist, esthetician, electrologist, or instructor as follows: 15.00 (A) If paid after September 30, 2027 10.00 (B) Beginning October 1, 2003 through September 30, 2027 15.00 (iii) Cosmetology establishment 25.00 (iv) School of cosmetology 100.00 (v) Secondary school facility 100.00 (b) Examination fees: (i) Complete examination for cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair culturist, esthetician, electrologist, or instructor 25.00 (ii) Written portion only 15.00 (iii) Practical portion only 15.00 (iv) Examination review 20.00 (c) License fees, per year: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) Cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair culturist, esthetician, electrologist, or instructor as follows: 42.00 (A) If paid after September 30, 2027 12.00 (B) Beginning October 1, 2003 through September 30, 2027 24.00 (ii) Cosmetology establishment 25.00150.00 (iii) School of cosmetology 100.00250.00 (iv) Secondary school facility 200.00 (d) Student registration or transfer fee as follows: 15.00 (i) If paid after September 30, 2027 5.00 (ii) Beginning October 1, 2003 through September 30, 2027 15.00 (2) At the beginning of each state fiscal year, the department may increase the fees collected under subsection (1) by a percentage amount equal to not more than the average percentage wage and salary increase granted for that state fiscal year to classified civil service employees employed by the department. (3) If the department increases fees under subsection (2), the increase is effective for that state fiscal year. The department shall use the increased fees as the basis for calculating fee increases in subsequent state fiscal years. (4) By August 1 of each year, the department shall provide to the director of the department of technology, management, and budget and the chairpersons of the appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives a complete schedule of fees to be collected under subsection (1) for the following state fiscal year. 1 2 3 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4692 (request no. H03413'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.